



































ENGLISH VERSION - TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM WHITE PAPER


TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

!1

GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

A TOKENOMY White Paper 

Last updated: January 27th, 2018 

!2



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

TABLE OF CONTENTS


DISCLAIMER……………………………………………………………………………………  5 
COMPANY BACKGROUND………………………………………………………………….   8 

A Brief History of Tokenomy………………………………………………………..    9 
What are TEN tokens……………………………………………………………..….    9 
Vision…………………………………………………………………………………….  10 
Former Experience……………………………………………………………………  11 
Asian Market…………………………………………………………………………..  12 

CHALLENGES………………………………………………………………………………….  17 
The Challenges of Undergoing Token Pre-Sales for Token Issuers…………  18 
The Challenges of Undergoing Token Pre-Sales for Investors……………….  19 

THE TEAM……………………………………………………………………………………… 22 
ADVISORS……………………………………………………………………………………… 25 

Technology Advisors…………………………………………………………………. 26 
International Advisors………………………………………………………………..  27 
Public Relation Advisors……………………………………………………………..  29 
Strategy Advisors……………………………………………………………………..  30 
Product Advisors……………………………………………………………………… 31 

Media Coverage………………………………………………………………………………. 32 
PRODUCT ACKNOWLEDGMENT………………………………………………………….  33 

Crowdfunding: Proposal and Tokenisation.……………………………………… 34 
Loyalty Points & Mileage Plan……………………………………………………… 38 
Customized Token……………………………………………………………………. 41 
Secondary Market…………………………………………………………………….  43 
Friendly, Easy-to-Use Mobile Application………………………………………..  46 

TOKENOMY: INITIAL TOKEN SALE………………………………………………………..  47 
What is an ITS?……………….……………………………………………………….  48 
ITS - Tranche 1…….……………………………………………………….………….     48 
ITS - Tranche 2…….……………………………………………………….………….     49 

!3



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

ITS - Tranche 3…….……………………………………………………….………….     50 
TEN Tokens Reserved by Company……………………………………………….  51 
TEN Token Usage…………………………………………………………………….. 52 
Token Distribution Ratio……………………………………………………………..  53 
Affiliate Marketing Program………………………………………………………… 53 
Bounty Program…………………………………………………………………..…..  53 

ROADMAP……………………………………………………………………………………… 55 
AFTERMATH…………………………………………………………………………………… 57 

Conclusion………………………………………………………………………………58 
Acknowledgments……………………………………………………………………..59 

REFERENCES………………………………………………………………………………….. 60 
DISCLAIMER……………….…………………………………………………………………..  61 

Preamble……………………………………………………………………………….. 62 
Disclaimer of Liability………………………………………………………………… 65 
No Representations and Warranties………………………………………………. 66 
Representations and Warranties by You…………………………………………. 66 
Cautionary Note on Forward-Looking Statements…………………………….. 70 
Third Party Information and No Consent of Other Persons……………….  73 
Terms Used……………………………………………………………………….……  73 
No Advice/Recommendation/Guidance………………………………………..…   74 
No Further Information or Update……………………………………………..…..  74 
Restrictions on Distribution and Dissemination………………………………… 74 
No Offer of Investment or Registration……………………………………….  75 
Risks and Uncertainties……………………………………………………………..   76 

 

!4



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

!5

DISCLAIMER



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

IMPORTANT NOTICE


IMPORTANT: YOU MUST READ THE FOLLOWING DISCLAIMER IN FULL BEFORE 

CONTINUING 

The sale of the TEN tokens (“TEN Tokens”), the exchange medium to pay fees between 

users and other participants of the Tokenomy Platform as detailed in this White Paper, is 

only intended for, made to or directed at, only persons outside the United States of 

America, the Republic of Singapore, and/or the People’s Republic of China (which shall 

exclude [the Hong Kong Special Administrative Region of the People's Republic of China, 

the Macau Special Administrative Region of the People’s Republic of China, and Taiwan]) 

(“PRC”), and may be acted upon only by persons outside the United States of America, 

the Republic of Singapore, and/or the PRC. Further, this White Paper is not a prospectus 

or offer document of any sort and is not intended to constitute an offer of securities in any 

form, units in a business trust, units in a collective investment scheme or any other form 

of investment, or to be considered a solicitation for any form of investment in any 

jurisdiction. No regulatory authority has examined or approved of any of the information 

set out in this White Paper. This White Paper has not been registered with any regulatory 

authority in any jurisdiction. 

By accessing and/or accepting possession of any information in this White Paper or such 

part thereof (as the case may be), you represent and warrant to Tokenomy Ltd. 

(Company Number 1963679) (“Issuer”) that: 

(a) you are not a citizen, resident, person domiciled in, or green card holder of the 

United States of America; 

(b) you are not a citizen, person domiciled in, or resident of the Republic of Singapore 

or the PRC; 

!6

6



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

(c) you are not a citizen, person domiciled in, or resident of a country the laws of 

which prohibit or conflict with the initial TEN Token sale (“ITS”) or your participation 

in the ITS (as referred hereto in the White Paper); 

(d) you agree to be bound by the limitations and restrictions described herein; and 

(e) you acknowledge that this White Paper has been prepared for delivery to you so 

as to assist you in making a decision as to whether to purchase the TEN Tokens. 

!7



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

!8

COMPANY 
BACKGROUND



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

A BRIEF HISTORY OF TOKENOMY 

TOKENOMY is your one-stop solution when it comes to purchasing TEN Tokens, as 
well as issuing your own cryptographic tokens. Our goal is to become a global token 
platform (“Tokenomy Platform”) with hundreds of tokens listed on our exchange, 
alongside additional features that can help anyone, from small entrepreneurs, 
merchants, and retailers to large enterprise businesses and developers, issue their own 
tokens to conduct fair and reliable crowdfunding. It is intended that these individuals 
and businesses will be able to raise the funds they need from trusted investors, and be 
provided with a platform to tokenize various products like loyalty points. People can 
easily trade loyalty points issued by a business for products and services they need, 
not only from said business, but from other businesses which have their loyalty points 
listed on the Tokenomy Platform as well. Tokens are intended to be interchangeable 
with hundreds of merchants and service providers. 

We provide 24/7 support to facilitate your business in generating your own tokens, from 
handling all technical aspects, maintaining security, providing free publication and 
marketing, to assisting you on the listing of your tokens on our exchange, and on other 
exchanges. Collaborating with Bitcoin.co.id (the biggest cryptocurrency exchange in 
Southeast Asia with more than 1 million users), we will help you list your tokens on their 
trading platforms and get expose you to the investors you need. For people interested in 
trading, major cryptocurrencies and new promising tokens will be tradable on the 
exchange on the Tokenomy Platform.


WHAT IS THE TEN TOKEN? 

The TEN Token is a new form of utility digital asset or token that is built on top of the 
Tokenomy Platform, more popularly known as TOKENOMY. It has been created to 
support a better, fairer and more reliant crowdfunding platform that can be used by 
anyone around the world.


!9

http://Bitcoin.co.id


TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

With the TEN Token, small businesses can compete on a global scale and fundraise to 
run their businesses through the issuance their own tokens on the Tokenomy Platform. 
Anyone can become investors to support the projects in which they are interested. 
Additionally, it is also intended that large companies, merchants, and startups can trade 
their loyalty points alike on the Tokenomy Platform in the form of their own tokens.


It is intended that TEN Tokens are tradable assets, as well as a payment method to 
make payments easier, faster, and frictionless in a new futuristic world and cashless 
society.


 

VISION 

At TOKENOMY, we plan to build a platform where anyone can help and offer small 
merchants, entrepreneurs, or even an 18-year-old kid with big ideas, a helping hand. 
We carefully select participants, analyse what they have, what they don’t, and look 
ahead to their prospects in the future. As people with limited knowledge have had 
difficulty distinguishing between companies that are truly valuable and worthy of 
support from those which are not, we think it is necessary to build a platform that is 
truly secure. The Tokenomy Platform was born from the desire to combat fraud, and 
prevent scams and unreliable organisations from trading with and taking advantage of 
legitimate companies.


Our goal is not just to become a global token platform for crowdfunding purposes, but 
to become the biggest platform for tokenisation. With the Tokenomy Platform, 
participants will be able to make investments and trade, business will be able to get 
funding, and a variety of products and services can be tokenised and become 
interchangeable across borders.


!10



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

FORMER EXPERIENCE 

The founders of TOKENOMY are not newcomers to the cryptocurrency world. Two of 
our founders were the inventors of Bitcoin.co.id, formally known as PT Bit Coin 
Indonesia, which is the biggest digital asset marketplace in Southeast Asia. 
Bitcoin.co.id was first established in February 2014, and it has maintained steady and 
ongoing growth since the beginning. Its monthly trading volume reached as high as 
US$230 million in November 2017, with more than 1 million active users.


Just like Bitcoin.co.id, the Tokenomy Platform was built to create a crypto-ecosystem 
that solely relys on blockchain technology, the secure and highly effective peer-to-peer 
distributed ledger system. With that in mind, we completely understand the challenges 
of businesses that deal with cryptocurrency transactions. We believe that the world is 
becoming more and more digitised, and that it is time to take a step forward.


!11

http://Bitcoin.co.id
http://Asia.Bitcoin.co.id
http://Bitcoin.co.id


TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

ASIAN MARKET 

We are choosing to target the Asian market based on the following considerations:


1. Asia is a market with huge and ongoing growth potential 

Asia is the largest and most populous of earth's continents and its located in both 
the northern and eastern hemispheres. Asia comprises a full 30% of the world's land 
area with 60% of the world's current population. It also has the highest growth rate 
today; its population almost quadrupled during the 20th century. The estimated 
population for Asia in 2016 is 4.4 billion and it has already reached 4,504,428,373 by 
2017.  In Southeast Asia alone, the total population has multiplied climbing to 1

approximately 648,780,040.  The median age in Asia is just 30.7 years, a young and 2

relatively open-minded demographic with regard to technology. Taken from 
worldometers.info, the following table will provide additional insight into the sub 
regions in Asia.  3

 Data was taken from World Population Review, http://worldpopulationreview.com/continents/asia-population/, accessed on November 1
4th 2017. 

 2 Data was taken from http://www.worldometers.info/world-population/south-eastern-asia-population/ 2

 Data was derived from the following website http://www.worldometers.info/world-population/population-by-asia-subregion/ (accessed 3
on November 4th 2017) 

!12

Region
Population
(2017)

Yearly
Change

Med.
Age

World
Share

Southern 
Asia

1.868.984.557 1,23% 26 24,8%

Eastern Asia 1.648.164.577 0,38% 38 21,8%

South-
Eastern Asia

648.780.040 1,09% 29 8,6%

Western Asia 267.659.524 1,8% 27 3,5%

Central Asia 70.839.675 1,51% 26 0,9%



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

2. According to the World Bank Group, 50% of the population is still underbanked 

in Southeast Asia, China and India  

Two billion people worldwide do not have a bank account or access to a financial 
institution via a mobile phone, or other device. This is beginning to change. Between 
2011 and 2014, 700 million adults became first time account holders, and the 
unbanked population fell by 20%, down  from  2.5  billion according to  the  World  
Bank's Global Financial Inclusion database and based on information from more than 
140 countries.  Even with such improvement, 2 billion adults across the globe remain 4

unbanked. South Asia and East Asia and the Pacific together account for more than 
half the world’s unbanked adults. South Asia, home to about 625 million adults 

without an account, has about 31 percent of the global total.  The following map from 5

Center for Financial Inclusion shows how most Asian countries have little access to 
open an account at a formal financial institution. The lighter the shade, the more 
people they have that don’t have access to bank accounts.  

 Camilla Hodgson, “The world's 2 billion unbanked, in 6 charts”, taken from the website of Business Insider UK, accessed on November 4
4th 2017 from the following website: http://uk.businessinsider.com/the-worlds-unbanked-population-in-6-charts-2017-8/?IR=T 

 The information is derived from the website of the World Bank Group at http://documents.worldbank.org/curated/en/ 5
187761468179367706/pdf/WPS7255.pdf#page=3, accessed on October 11th 2017. 

!13



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

3. Two countries in Asia are major and globally recognized financial hubs 
Hong Kong and Singapore are competing for the title of Asia's most important 
financial hub.  Considered the gateway to Southeast Asia and seen as a wealth 6

management hub, Singapore was ranked the 3rd most competitive financial center 
in the world. According to the latest iteration of the Global Financial Centers Index 
(GFCI) that was published by the think tanks Z/Yen and China Development 
Institute , Singapore was also ranked 2nd in PriceWaterHouseCooper’s City of 7

Opportunity index and is ranked as the 6th largest wealth management center in the 
world by Deliotte.  Hong Kong is also a strong financial center, it has long served as 8

the gateway to mainland China and has the necessary expertise, information and 
facilities to tap into the Chinese marketplace. This proximity and history has helped 
make Hong Kong the largest trading partner of Mainland China. 

4. Economic Growth in Asia 

According to the International Monetary Fund’s latest regional assessment, the Asia 
and Pacific region continues to deliver strong growth, even in the face of widespread 
concerns about growing protectionism, a rapidly aging society, and slow productivity 
growth.‑  A quick look at Southeast Asia Region reveals that in 2016, its combined 9
gross domestic product (“GDP”) (if considered as a single economy) placed it as the 
6th largest in the world and the 3rd largest in Asia, at US$2.55 trillion, which is more 
than 4 times the ASEAN GDP in 1999.  The following table shows the percentage of 10

GDP Change in Asian countries:


 Rohini Samtani, “Hong Kong vs. Singapore: Weighing Asia's financial hubs”, article was seen in the following website: https:// 6
www.cnbc.com/2017/04/24/hong-kong-vs-singapore-weighing-asias-financial-hubs.html (accessed on November 4th 2017) 

 Dennis Brandes et al., “Deloitte Global Wealth Management Centre Ranking 2015” (Zurich, Switzerland: Deloitte Consulting AG, 2015). 7

 Mark Yeandle, “Global Financial Centres Index 20” (London, U.K.: Z/Yen Group and China Development Institute, September 2016).8

 IMF, “Asia Dynamic Economies Continue to Lead Global Growth”, taken from the following website: https://www.imf.org/en/News/ 9
Articles/2017/05/08/NA050917-Asia-Dynamic-Economies-Continue-to-Lead-Global-Growth on November 4th, 2017 

 The information is derived from the website of ASEANstats at http://www.aseanstats.org/wp-content/uploads/2017/08/ 10
ASEAN50_Master_Publication.pdf, accessed on October 31st 2017.

!14

http://www.aseanstats.org/wp-content/uploads/2017/08/


TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

 

!15



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

 

5. Digital Growth in Asia-Pacific 

Taken from Simon Kemp’s article on Wearesocial.com, titled “Digital in 2017 Global 
Overview”, the Asia-Pacific region accounted for 70% of the total growth in global 
internet users, 62% of the growth in social media users, and 64% of the growth in 
mobile social media users.  11

 11

!16



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

!17

CHALLENGES



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

THE CHALLENGES OF UNDERGOING TOKEN PRE-SALES FOR TOKEN ISSUERS 

We at TOKENOMY are trying to combat the challenges of undergoing a token sale so 
that more people, even those with minimal technical skills, will be able to participate in a 
token sale. Some of the most common issues people deal with when they are trying to 
generate their own tokens and undertaking a token sale include:


• Legality 
Regulations, in most countries, are not yet clear regarding the sale of digital coins 
and/or cryptographic tokens. Though the fact is still debatable, undertaking a token 
sale can contain huge risks in the future. Legal support in this regard, especially from 
the relevant government(s), is costly, tiring, and time-consuming. Large and 
financially endowed entrepreneurs may be unable to pursue a variety of legal 
options, but small companies are not likely to stand a chance.


• Technology 
Generating your own tokens for a token sale is a complex process and learning the 
technology involved could be a barrier to entry. The process is simply but not 
intuitive, and is not as easy as learning simple programmes. It is highly technical, 
very new, and there are not many programmers out there that have the expertise to 
take up such work; hence hiring skilled workers could be a challenge.


• Security 
Because of the potential vulnerabilities, hackers have been known to exploit and 
attack token sale projects, especially those that are not securely guarded. Less 
experienced programmers are the easiest targets, their risk is even higher if they do 
not implement cold storage protocols.


• Marketing 

Most new entrepreneurs do not have strong business connections or well-
established networks. Advertising and marketing may be a substantial drain of their 
financial resources.


!18



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

• Looking to get listed in exchanges 
If you are getting positive reviews from news websites, being covered by the press 
and financial or crypto-media, and/or have a large fan base, the path to listing on an 
exchange is clear. For those who are just starting out, getting listed on 
cryptocurrency exchanges is a challenge. If you’re just getting started, it may take 
your best effort just to remain in the competition and set up the minimum business 
networks you’ll need to eventually be listed. The road to getting listed in an 
exchange, particularly one with only a few customers, will be long and painful for a 
startup or new group without solid connections.


• Sustainability  
In our opinion, if a token sale project has many investors, its tokens will likely be in 
demand. If a token sale project has few investors but the support of a substantial 
community, its tokens will likely survive for a few months. However, token sale 
projects that have only 1-2 investors, and the support of a small community, its 
tokens are not likely to be in demand or even known.


THE CHALLENGES OF UNDERGOING TOKEN PRE-SALES FOR INVESTORS 

Designed for token issuers but flexible and accessible for all, the Tokenomy Platform 
provides the best solution for investors looking for new tokens to invest. You might think 
it is easy to participate in a token sale, but risky challenges lie ahead for naive investors. 
Taken from an article called “Open Source: Token Best Practice”, written by Simon 
Taylor on 20 October 2017, the following is a (non-exhaustive) list of challenges 
investors often face during a token sale:


• Lack of Standardized Information 
To invest, we need to know what kind of project we’re going to deal with and 
accurate, concise, clear information is vital for price discovery as well to understand 
the investment risk involved. The Tokenomy Platform will provide a new, easy-to-

!19



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

understand platform for a potential investor to learn everything he needs to know 
about a particular token sale in which he is interested. Such information directly is 
intended to be directly provided by token issuers.


• Perception of Risk  

In some cases, white papers can be misleading and may not contain details of the 
risk involved. Investors are reliant on white papers to fully understand a token or 
token sale project. Such papers however often reveal only the positive parts of the 
project, and gloss over the negative aspects or risks involved. When a paper is 
misleading, investors can easily be convinced to invest in things they do not truly 
understand. Without a clear understanding of the offering, these investors may 
choose to participate trivial factors, including but not limited to the token sale 
project being well-marketed. As with any new technological development, there is a 
significant risk of asset bubbles as investors overlook crucial details of a project in 
the search for yield. Balancing this with appropriate data and transparency will be 

!20



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

crucial going forward, TOKENOMY uses built-in proprietary methods to ensure all 
information provided is accurate and no significant information is omitted. We 
provide transparency for investors and are clear about the positive and negative 
aspects of a token, making it easier for them to make fair decisions when deciding 
to invest.


• Potential Market Manipulation  

Investors are often reliant on alternative sources of information – such as discussion 
forums – which are open to potential market manipulation. TOKENOMY is intended 
to address this by only publishing accurate, factual, and clear information.


• Access to Secondary Markets 

Secondary markets are another vital tool for price discovery. Some tokens are issued 
with limited ‘lock-up’ periods where they cannot be exchanged on a secondary 
market and others are not. This is confusing for investors and the transferability of 
tokens needs to be addressed. In TOKENOMY, we provide direct platforms where 
tokens can be traded directly to major cryptocurrencies (such as BTC, ETH, and 
WAVES) that are familiar and easy enough for investors to deal with. Collaborating 
with Bitcoin.co.id — the biggest cryptocurrency platform in Southeast Asia with 1 
million users — this trading process can be done instantly and seamlessly, at the 
preferred time of a tokenholder.


!21

http://Bitcoin.co.id


TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

!22

THE TEAM



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

OSCAR DARMAWAN - CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER                  

Oscar Darmawan, co-founded Bitcoin.co.id, the biggest bitcoin 
and blockchain startup in Indonesia which facilitates 
cryptocurrency trading for more than 1 million registered users. 
He soon became the Chief Executive Officer for the company, 
which has become the largest cryptocurrency platform in 
South East Asia. In the past 4 years, Oscar has been focusing 
on building the blockchain ecosystem in Indonesia. He 
graduated from Monash University, majoring in Information 
Technology and System.


 

WILLIAM SUTANTO - CHIEF TECHNOLOGY OFFICER 
Along with Oscar Darmawan, William founded Bitcoin.co.id 
back in 2013. He is a professional head engineer who is 
responsible behind all the technology of Bitcoin.co.id. William 
has a strong Internet Technology and Project Development 
background based on his 9 years’ experience working in the 
field. William is currently residing in Bali to fully support the 
exchange while working on upcoming projects.


 



JACK LI - CHIEF MARKETING OFFICER 

After a career in private banking, Jack Li joined Navis Capital 
Partners (“Navis”) in 2016 where he is responsible for the 
sourcing and negotiation of proprietary investment 
opportunities. Established in 1998, Navis is a specialised mid-
cap buyout firm with over US$4.5 billion in investments. Before 
coming to Navis, Mr Li spent 9 years at 2 American investment 
banks in Boston, Hong Kong, and Singapore. He was a Vice 
President of the Ultra High Net Worth division responsible for 
the development of JPMorgan’s financial sponsors business in 
Southeast Asia.


!23



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

VILLE OEHMAN - FUND MANAGER 

Ville is a M.Sc. (technology management), MBA, 
Certified Islamic Finance Executive and certified DGCX 
trader. He has invested in several cryptocurrency 
companies in Asia, Europe and Middle East. Ville is also 
the co-founder and fund manager of a fully regulated 
cryptocurrency fund domiciled on Cayman Islands, and 
managed from Singapore under the full capital markets 
services license of Helvetic Investments. Ville is a 
frequent speaker on cryptocurrencies in universities, 
media and financial technology events, including the 
leading Islamic finance conferences in Singapore and 
Indonesia.




SUASTI ATMASTUTI A - BUSINESS DEV. MANAGER 

Graduated magna cum laude from Parahyangan 
University, Suasti had experience in working as an 
assistant researcher and co-wrote a book titled “Asia 
Pacific: Konflik, Kerjasama dan Relasi Antarkawasan.” 
She worked for Banking Strategic Learning, a 
financial solution provider company, for 2 years 
before she joined the cryptocurrency field. She 
became the Business Development Director for the 
Bitislands Project and did marketing for BitBayar.com
—a Bitcoin payment gateway to enable merchants to 
accept payments in Bitcoin.


 



VINCENTIA OLGA - COMMUNICATION MANAGER 

A graduate from University of Birmingham with a 
Bachelor of Science International Business with 
Upper Second-Class Honors, Vicentia is an 
enthusiastic self-starter with strong leadership and 
communication skills. Assisted in developing private 
company for increasing their awareness.


!24

http://BitBayar.com


TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

!25

ADVISORS



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

TECHNOLOGY ADVISORS 
 

TOTO SUGIRI


Toto Sugiri is a veteran in the Indonesia technology 
scene. He is the founder and self-funder of 
Indonesia’s first tier four data center, DCI, a mentor in 
Founder Institute Jakarta, and the founder of the 900-
man Sigma Group that was acquired by Telkom 
Indonesia in 2007. Toto completed his Masters in 
Computer Engineering in Germany and returned to 
Indonesia in 1980. Toto currently takes on an advisory 
role in the projects that he is involved.


 

IZAK JENIE  

Izak Jenie is a technology entrepreneur. Izak made 
his name through the creation of one of the first 
Indonesian e-wallets. He has also recently 
successfully listed of one of his digital businesses, PT 
M Cash Integrasi Tbk (MCAS IJ), on the Indonesia 
Stock Exchange,. Izak is also the Chief Technology 
Officer at one of the most successful digital business 
integrators, PT Kresna Graha Investama TBk (KREN 
IJ). He also sits on the boards of some digital 
startups and has been active in coaching 
enterpreneurs and professionals who focus on the 
digital space in Indonesia.  

!26



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

INTERNATIONAL ADVISORS 
 

ANSON ZEALL 

Anson is the co-founder / Chief Executive Officer of 
CoinPip, a business payout service leveraging on 
blockchain technologies. Backed by 500 Startups, 
Coinpip is one of the most prominent venture capital 
firms in Silicon Valley and has been cooperating with 
Bitcoin.co.id for a few years now. Anson is an alumnus 
of University of New South Wales and Columbia 
Business School. Prior to CoinPip, he ran a private 
family office in Singapore managing various asset 
classes, equities, derivatives and real estate. 
 
 
ROBERTO CAPODIECI 
 
Roberto discovered a passion for information 
technology at the tender age of 6. By the time he has 
10, he had developed and sold his first video game. 
Roberto, specialises in lawful interception systems and 
big data analysis, is also a consultant to law 
enforcement agencies, associate of the NXT Issuer and 
the first to apply blockchain technology to supply chain 
and trade finance. Founder of the Blockchain Zoo 
association, Roberto often speaks at conferences on 
blockchain.  
 
 
 
SASHA IVANOV 
 

Sasha Ivanov has been involved in Internet payment 
systems software development and neural network 
prediction solutions. After the emergence of blockchain 
technology he launched the first instant cryptocurrency 
exchange, Coinomat.com, the first fiat blockchain token, 
CoinoUSD, and the first tradable cryptocurrency index, 
Coinoindex.com. He leads the WAVES platform, which 
has a current market cap of over US$500 million and is 
built on a custom SCALA-based blockchain focused on 
tokenisation.


!27

http://Bitcoin.co.id
http://Coinomat.com
http://Coinoindex.com


TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

WILLSON CUACA 
 
 
 
 

Willson Cuaca is co-founder and managing partner of 
East Ventures, one of the most active early stage venture 
fund that focus in South East Asia. Willson brings in 
experience in ecosystem building, product / market fit 
and strategic advice with his investment into hundreds of 
early stage startups in the region. East Ventures was 
involved in Indonesia startup scene since a very 
beginning when no one believed in the market potential. 
East Ventures is well positioned to experience directly all 
the major milestones in Indonesia startup scene, working 
together with founders and stakeholders to develop the 
industry from a nascent ecosystem.




KENNETH OH 
 

Kenneth Oh is a practising lawyer and Senior Partner with 
Dentons Rodyk & Davidson LLP’s Corporate Practice, and 
China / Indonesia Practices. In legal practice for close to 
two decades, he specialises in corporate finance as well 
as mergers & acquisitions. Legal directory Asia Pacific 
Legal 500 has listed Kenneth as being “...admired for his 
quickness of mind and his ability to come up with creative 
solutions...” and an “equity capital markets specialist”. 
Kenneth is also cofounder of Monetary Authority of 
Singapore-licensed asset management firm Ferrell 
Financial and of boutique venture capital firm Omnibridge, 
and serves as independent director of several companies 
listed on the Stock Exchange of Hong Kong Limited / 
Singapore Exchange (Securities Trading) Limited and 
chairs certain of their corporate governance committees.


!28



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

PUBLIC RELATIONS ADVISOR





YOS ADIGUNA GINTING 
 

As the founder and chairman of the board of directors of 
the Indonesia Services Dialogue Council, Yos seeks to 
accelerate the development of the blockchain-based 
services sector in Indonesia through the establishment of 
a coalition of stakeholders. Yos is active in encouraging 
the formulation of regulations that encourage the growth 
of the business world in Indonesia through its position as 
chairman of the permanent committee of international 
trade in KADIN Indonesia and APINDO. Yos holds a PhD 
in Computational and Theoretical Chemistry from the 
University of Tasmania Australia and is an independent 
director of one of Indonesia’s largest public companies 
with over 20 years’ experience in the field of advocacy 
for the establishment of regulations, business 
management and international trade.


 

!29



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

STRATEGY ADVISORS


CARLOS M. PARADA 
 

Carlos is a business developer who has specialises in 
blockchain technology since ear ly 2011. His 
multidisciplinary background includes programming and 
industrial prototyping. Since 2007, Carlos has been 
based in Indonesia, where he has collaborated with the 
Ministry of Transportation to lay the issuers for a joint 
venture between a private company and Angkasa Pura I 
(Indonesian Airport Authorities). He has also worked with 
well-known companies such as Kompas Gramedia and 
Bank Negara Indonesia (BNI).





SHINJI KIMURA 
 

Shinji Kimura is an active entrepreneur and investor. Aside 
from being the CEO and founder of accomplished 
companies such as Gunosy and Anypay, he is an active 
investor in new technology through his CEO and partner 
post at Das Capital. He is a visionary who wishes to see a 
universally decentralized and deregulated economic 
world.


 

MICKEY MILOJKO SPAJIC 

Mickey Milojko Spajic is Das Capital’s partner and 
crypto-currency entrepreneur. He strongly believes in 
technologies and business models that enhance the 
inter-human trust, such as crypto-currencies and 
other implementations of blockchain tech, shared 
economy etc. He was previously a part of distressed-
credit team at Goldman Sachs, and fixed income 
desk at Citi Bank.


!30



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

PRODUCT ADVISORS 



BENSON KAWENGIAN 
 

With a background in finance, he is the Founder and 
President at Beka Asia Group, an Indonesian business 
group in construction, technology, and services. One of his 
companies, PT. Datra Internusa is a leading construction 
firm that builds inspiring venues like stadia, arenas, and 
halls; involved in renovation projects for Asian Games 
2018. In technology, he is a partner at RMKB Ventures, 
CEO at Urbanhire, and he was included in Tech in Asia's 
Top 40 Indonesian Startup Founders list. He is also an 
active member of the TED community, G20 Young 
Entrepreneurs of Indonesia and a board member at 
Entrepreneurs’ Organization Indonesia Chapter. A former 
executive at Bloomberg LP, Benson earned his MBA with 
High Distinction at the University of Queensland (St. Lucia).


EDY SULISTYO  
 

Edy Sulistyo is a serial techology entrepreneur who has 
founded and exited several startups such as eEvent, 
OW.com, and Kamus.net. He is currently the founder and 
Chief Executive Officer of LOKÉT (acquired by GO-JEK), a 
technology company that focused on creating the best 
experience for events and entertainments. In the past, he 
founded and architected a number of companies and web 
products including Katolik.com, FilesUpload, DNOrganizer, 
iConvert, Parking-Hub, CircleMail, and OpenStub.


 
 
LAWRENCE SAMANTHA 
 

Lawrence is an old-timer in the cryptocurrency mining and 
trading world, dating back to 2011. His computer science 
expertise had led him to multiple companies such as 
Nationwide Financial (210 billion managed asset) & 
Bittorrent, Inc (decentralized peer-to-peer network). 
Cryptoworld is still in its infancy, and his drive to make an 
impact on the right thing is the reason why he created 
several crypto-solutions such as BitHarga for instant 
cryptocurrency pricing analysis and HonestMining, whose 
mission is to create a trustworthy crypto-mining service 
that is accessible to everyone.


!31

http://OW.com
http://Kamus.net
http://Katolik.com


TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

Our team has been recognized by various media outlets from all 

around the world  













!32



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

!33

PRODUCT
ACKNOWLEDGMENT



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

PRODUCT ACKNOWLEDGMENT 

As a utility token, the TEN Token offers several features that can be applied in various 
sectors, such as:


1. Crowdfunding: Proposal and Tokenization 

Anyone in the world can submit a proposal to explain more about their projects and has 
a fair chance to earn a fundraising. With the TEN Token and the Tokenomy platform, this 
can be done within minutes. Individuals, groups, merchants and companies that wish to 
fundraise can invent their own tokens very easily with the help of TOKENOMY. In future, 
it is intended that these tokens may be traded with other cryptocurrencies, and be 
applied as a payment method—if there are merchants that are willing to accept them. 
Alternatively, these tokens may be exchanged with products and services from the 
issuer. There are many options; the actual approach depends on the wants of the 
creator.


A proposal should include the details of the tokens that is intended to be generated 
before they can be listed on the Tokenomy Platform (following issuance). Submitting a 
proposal requires a specific amount of TEN Tokens. Proposals that are paid and sent to 
the Tokenomy Platform will be carefully audited by our legal team and specialists in 
specific areas before being published for public sale — provided that the proposal is 
proven to be legitimate.


The TOKENOMY team will provide full support and facilities needed by the applicants 
during the process of issuing their tokens. With TOKENOMY, applicants will not have to 
worry about technical aspects on implementing tokens. Every process will be guided by 
our team. Within a week of proposal approval, it is possible that your tokens could be 
generated and traded in on the Tokenomy Platform.


!34



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

The support and facilities we provide for our applicants include:


• Proposal Overview and Auditing Process  
The TOKENOMY team collaborates with experienced and highly qualified legal 
officers from Southeast Asia countries. Through our careful assessment and risk 
management process, we analyse the prospects of the proposal you submit.


• Generating Tokens 
Creating your own tokens and going through a token sale can be a long, exhausting 
process. Here at TOKENOMY, the process of generating tokens is intended to be 
fast, easy, and error free. We handle all the technical aspects from the beginning until 
the end. You will not have to generate your own wallet or worry about cold storage, 
and the smart contract codes created for you are to the best of our knowledge safe 
and secure. By using the Tokenomy Platform, you can automatically generate your 
own tokens, and can simply choose whether you wish to use Ethereum or WAVES as 
your underlying technology. 

!35



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

• Publication 
What makes your token better than others? Why should people support your 
project? Most importantly, why should investors spend their money to buy your 
tokens? You will have to let us have the answers to these questions in detail if you 
expect people to invest. With us, you will not have to create your own website. 
The website creation process is easy for big companies, but for startups and 
small businesses, money is needed for hiring web developers, paying site domain, 
hosting, security, auditing and regular maintenance; the amount of funding 
needed can easily drain your available resources. With TOKENOMY, we have will 
have pre-set profile page catered to you to run token sales. This page can be 
filled and edited by users to promote their tokens, and also shows the 
TOKENOMY rating of the proposal you submitted. You will receive your own 
profile page that is accessible with a subdomain from TOKENOMY. For example, 
your site could be named and located at “mycoin.tokenomy.com”  and your token 
sale could be up and running in minutes. You can even attach your white paper for 
public consumption — as you would be able to on your own, personal website.


• Marketing 
Every token sale project will be announced through email and mobile notifications to 
all users on a daily or weekly basis depends on the individual subscriber preference. 
All projects will be listed on our website and social media to ensure maximum 
audience exposure.


• Primary Market (Tokens sale)  
Fundraisers will not have have to worry about searching for potential investors to 
invest in your tokens. You will not even have to educate people on how to buy your 
tokens! You might have heard how hard it is to buy a token; when processes are 
overly complicated; new users can easily get confused. A more straightforward, 
streamlined process allows investors to install an Ethereum Wallet and properly 
make a transfer to smart contracts. Simply installing a wallet and making transfers 
can allow most users to participate, but can also increase risk, particularly for those 
who are not crypto savvy or who are inexperienced. With the help of TOKENOMY, 

!36

http://mycoin.tokenomy.com


TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

investors will be able to easily purchase an issuer’s tokens with major 
cryptocurrencies, such as BTC, ETH, WAVES, and TEN Tokens. To sum up the 
process and services we provide, you can see the following flowchart.


!37



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

2. Loyalty Points & Mileage Plan 

TEN Tokens are intended to be traded not only with digital assets but also loyalty points 
of various companies. There are many cases where a company awards its customers 
loyalty points when goods and services are purchased. However, loyalty points are 
usually only redeemable within an issuer’s pre-set limits.


For example, Alice has a small handbag store that is popular enough to issue its own 
loyalty points, complete with an exclusive membership card. In order to attract more 
customers, she gives out a generous amount of loyalty points for people that become 
regular shoppers at her store. These points can be redeemed and exchanged for various 
bags and purses. 


Bob, one of Alice’s loyal customers, has managed to earn a substantial number of 
loyalty points. Bob wants to redeem his points, but he doesn’t need any more 
merchandise from Alice’s store. He needs a new pair of shoes, but Alice doesn’t sell 

!38



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

them. Bob is however unable to exchange the loyalty points issued by Alice’s store in 
another store which has shoes as its merchandise, as the said loyalty points may only 
be redeemed in Alice’s store.


At TOKENOMY, we envisage the introduction of a system in which loyalty points of 
different issuers may be interchangeable through loyalty points issuers’ participation in 
the Tokenomy Platform as token issuers. The tokens they generated would represent the 
loyalty points that issuers would issuer to their customers.


In the aforementioned example, instead of receiving loyalty points that can only be 
redeemed in Alice’s store, Bob receives ALC tokens issued by Alice’s store. These ALC 
tokens can be exchanged for other digital assets for investment and trading purposes, 
or traded for other tokens that also represent loyalty points from other companies. 
Hence, if Bob wishes to purchase a new pair of shoes from James’ shoe store (which 
issues JMS tokens via the Tokenomy Platform and also listed thereto for trading as its 
loyalty points programme), he can trade the ALC tokens received from Alice for JMS 
tokens. The same holds true for the reverse situation: holders of JMS tokens will also be 
able to trade JMS tokens for ALC tokens for the exchange of goods from Alice’s stores.


This can happen automatically, with just a simple few clicks!


The above is applicable to various schemes of various sectors, for example, airlines’ 
mileage plans, which are essential loyalty programs for customers who fly frequently 
with a specific airline. If mileage points earned from such programmes were tradable as 
tokens on the Tokenomy Platform, such mileage points could be traded for the mileage 
points of another airline for consumption.


!39



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM




!40



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

3. Customized Token 

If you have a business idea and wish to issue your own customised tokens, we are able 
do this by providing you with the facilities and support you need in order to do so. The 
possibilities are limitless.


To cite an example: a budding musician is beginning to garner fame and a significant fan 
base. The said musician intends to release an album, and wishes to do so on its own 
without being contractually bound to a record label. In order to fundraise for the 
preparation of the album, the musician may consider generating and issuing its own 
tokens via the Tokenomy Platform to the public which will accord tokenholders certain 
privileges, which could include access to the musician’s latest album, gifts of free tickets 
to the musician’s live shows, or exclusive backstage passes. The musician will be able 
to fundraise for an album, and simultaneously give back to fans (and tokenholders) for 
their support.


This is your dream.


TOKENOMY turns it into reality.


!41



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM




!42

CHALLENGES



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

4. Secondary Market (Trading Platform)  

As you move through the Tokenomy process and your primary market stage is 
completed, your project will be upgraded automatically to the secondary market stage. 
Tokens are intended to be available for sale on the Tokenomy Platform. This exchange is 
live and open for business 24/7, all year long. Users wish to collect specific tokens will 
be able to purchase them with TEN Tokens. This will continue until the volume trading 
for such tokens reaches a certain threshold; if the threshold is exceeded, new trading 
platforms will be launched with new trading pairs consist of major cryptocurrencies, for 
example: TOKEN - BTC and TOKEN - ETH.


TOKENOMY will cooperate with Bitcoin.co.id which already has more than 1 million 
users in their exchange. We will do login sharing so that users of Bitcoin.co.id can 
immediately become investors in TOKENOMY. With the large combined pool of 
investors, it may not be difficult to imagine and attain a successful token sale.


!43

http://Bitcoin.co.id
http://Bitcoin.co.id


TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

To cite an example, Bob, who is an owner of a new electronic store called Sierra, wishes 
fundraise to expand his business. He creates a token called the Sierra Token (SRA), 
which offers SRA-holders significant discounts when buying cellphones and computers 
at his store. Bob submits a proposal to TOKENOMY for review, and pays the requisite 
amount of TEN Tokens review fee.


Bob’s proposal is reviewed and approved in approximately a week. Bob will able to list 
SRA on the Tokenomy Platform with its very own profile page that is accessible with the 
subdomain of SRA.tokenomy.com, as well as the relevant material in any way he likes, 
and get free marketing asssiatance with his projects.


SRA would also be available to be purchased with BTC, ETH, WAVES, and TEN Tokens. 
It will be listed as SRA/TEN in our platform. If monthly trading volume reaches 1,000,000 
TEN Tokens, SRA will also be listed to be paired with Bitcoin (SRA / BTC).


Assuming that demand for SRA and the corresponding SRA price increases, investors 
that bought SRA in the early days when its price was relatively lower will have the 
options to sell their SRA for a quick profit or hold onto it for later use. Together with 
Bitcoin.co.id, the biggest cryptocurrency exchange in Southeast Asia, TOKENOMY aims 
to provide a platform on which users would be able to sell their tokens anytime they 
want. Compared to traditional investment options wherein investors a significant waiting 
period before they are able to cash out their investment for profit, the TOKENOMY 
approach is easier, faster, and more efficient for profit-taking. Buyers can also become 
traders or market makers that actively trade for daily profit, taking advantage of SRA’s 
price changes.


Bob receives the funds he requires, is able to build a bigger store, and to attract more 
customers who wish they want to trade their SRA for special discounts when purchasing 
electronic goods from Bob’s store.


The following illustration summarises the above example.


!44

http://SRA.tokenomy.com
http://Bitcoin.co.id


TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM




!45



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

5. Friendly, Easy-to-Use Mobile Application 

TOKENOMY is also intending to come up with a mobile application for both Android and 
iOS users which will be available for on Google Play Store and the Apple App Store. The 
mobile application will make it easier for a user to keep track of new tokens that are 
being listed on TOKENOMY, and allow you to trade tokens online.


You will be required to login after you install the application on your device, using the 
same login combination you use in TOKENOMY. The process is simple but highly 
secure. Users have to option of setting up 6-digit pin number (or TouchID for iPhone 
users) afterwards to speed up your login process. With a user-friendly interface, you can 
trade anytime and anywhere you want only with a few quick taps and swipes.


!46



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

!47

TOKENOMY: 
INITIAL TOKEN SALE



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

What is an Initial Token Sale (ITS)? 

An ITS is an event in which a new cryptocurrency project sells all or part of its 
cryptographic tokens to early adopters and enthusiasts in exchange for funding. This 
has recently become a well-documented way to raise funds to upscale an existing 
product or service. It is a quick way to bypass traditional funding routes to gain access 
to funds in order to speed up development, which are much slower.


1. ITS – Tranche 1 

ITS – Tranche 1 starts on 8 January 2018 at 3.00 pm Singapore Time (UTC +8). ITS – 
Tranche 1 is open to the public with a special price for 1 week only. The details are as 
follows:


• With 1 BTC, you get 80,000 TENs


• There are only 40,000,000 TENs available for sale in ITS – Tranche 1


• The minimum purchase for TEN is 0.5 BTC


• There is no maximum purchase for TEN as long as the TEN tokens are still available 
for sale


• ITS – Tranche 1 starts on 8 January 2018 at 3.00 pm Singapore Time (UTC +8)


• ITS – Tranche 1 ends on 15 January 2018 at 3.00 pm Singapore Time (UTC +8)


• Ten Tokens will be distributed on or about 20 January 2018


• TEN Tokens can be purchased with BTC on the following website: 
token.tokenomy.com


!48

http://token.tokenomy.com


TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

• Special condition for those who wish to buy TEN Tokens with ETH: the applicable 
exchange rate (as at the time of conversion of ETH to BTC) as derived from 
Coinmarketcap will be applicable to the conversion of ETH to BTC for the purposes 
of determining TEN Tokens entitlement.


• Every unsold TEN Token during ITS - Tranche 1 will be burned automatically by the 
end of this period.


2. ITS – Tranche 2 

ITS – Tranche 2 starts on 15 January 2018 at 3.00 pm Singapore Time (UTC +8). The 
details are as follows:


• With 1 BTC, you get 60,000 TENs


• There are only 60,000,000 TENs available for sale


• The minimum purchase for TEN is 0.5 BTC


• There is no maximum purchase for TEN as long as the TEN tokens are still available 
for sale


• ITS – Tranche 2 starts from 15 January 2018 at 3.00 pm Singapore Time (UTC +8)


• ITS – Tranche 2 ends on 5 February 2018 at 3.00 pm Singapore Time (UTC +8)


• Token will be distributed on or about 20 February 2018


• TEN Tokens may be purchased with BTC on the following website: 
token.tokenomy.com


• Special condition for those who wish to buy TEN Tokens with ETH: the applicable 
exchange rate (as at the time of conversion of ETH to BTC) as derived from 

!49

http://token.tokenomy.com


TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

Coinmarketcap will be applicable to the conversion of ETH to BTC for the purposes 
of determining TEN Tokens entitlement. 


• Every unsold TEN Token during ITS - Tranche 2 will be burned automatically by the 
end of this period.


3. ITS – Tranche 3 

ITS – Tranche 3 starts on 5 February 2018 at 3.00 pm Singapore Time (UTC +8) and runs 
for another week after ITS – Tranche 2. The details are as follows:


• With 1 BTC, you get 40,000 TENs


• There are only 10,000,000 TENs available for sale


• The minimum purchase for TEN is 0.5 BTC


• There is no maximum purchase for TEN as long as the TEN tokens are still available 
for sale


• ITS – Tranche 3 starts from 5 February 2018 at 3.00 pm Singapore Time (UTC +8)


• ITS – Tranche 3 ends on 12 February 2018 at 3.00 pm Singapore Time (UTC +8)


• Token will be distributed on or about 1 March 2018


• TEN Tokens may be purchased with BTC on the following website: 
token.tokenomy.com


• Special condition for those who wish to buy TEN Tokens with ETH: the applicable 
exchange rate (as at the time of conversion of ETH to BTC) as derived from 
Coinmarketcap will be applicable to the conversion of ETH to BTC for the purposes 
of determining TEN Tokens entitlement.


!50

http://token.tokenomy.com


TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

• Every unsold TEN Token during ITS - Tranche 3 will be burned automatically by the 
end of this period.


TEN TOKENS RESERVED BY COMPANY 

Total TEN Tokens Allocated : 90 Million TEN Tokens


Purpose:  

1. Held in reserve by Tokenomy in order to fund future transactions and expand 
liquidity; partnerships required for future growth and expansion


2. Commision for Affiliate program


3. Founders and Advisors reward for the development of the Tokenomy and their 
continued long term involvement with the project


4. Used for bounty programs and community initiatives to reward developers, 
entrepreneurs, strategists and community members


Availability:  

• 11 Million TEN Tokens will be released immediately for affiliate commission 


• 79 Million TEN Tokens will be locked for 6 months


!51



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

TOKEN USAGE 

There are 6 main utilities of TEN tokens. These are all intertwined with the services 
provided by TOKENOMY, meaning that TEN serves as a critical part of the whole 
ecosystem:


1. Discounts on Trading Fees 
User will receive 50% discount on trading fees, both in Bitcoin.co.id—the biggest 
cryptocurrency exchange in Southeast Asia with more than 1 million users—and 
TOKENOMY’s exchange, if he/she holds a certain amount of TEN 

2. Trading Tokens 
TEN will be the main trading pair for all tokens and cryptocurrencies on 
TOKENOMY’s exchange platform 

3. Token Purchase 
TEN can be used for token sales held on TOKENOMY


4. Token Proposal Application 
To submit an application, the payment must be made in TEN 

5. Affiliate Programs 
All affiliate programs will be paid in TEN 

6. Token Listings 

External tokens can be listed on TOKENOMY’s exchange by paying for the fees in 
TEN


!52



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

TOKEN DISTRIBUTION RATIO 

AFFILIATE MARKETING PROGRAM 

TOKENOMY has an affiliate marketing program for its ITS that commences on 8 January 
2018, 3.00 pm Singapore Time (UTC +8). If a user refers another person (the “New 
Purchaser”) to purchase TEN Tokens using the aforementioned user’s referral code, the 
said user will receive a commission in the form of 10% of the TEN Tokens purchased by 
the New Purchaser. TEN Tokens received as commission hereto will be accorded the 
same rights as other TEN Token.


BOUNTY PROGRAM 

Additionally, TOKENOMY also has a bounty program that is open publicly in order to 
promote our community and token sale. Users who apply for this program will receive 
TEN tokens for free in exchange of their effort in running our campaigns, such as: Twitter 
Campaign, Written Contest, and Bitcoin Talk Signature Campaign. 


Percentage of TEN Tokens for ITS – 
Tranche 1

20%

Percentage of TEN Tokens for ITS – 
Tranche 2

30%

Percentage of TEN Tokens for ITS – 
Tranche 3

5%

Percentage of TEN Tokens for community 
initiatives, affiliate commission, etc 20%

Percentage of TEN Tokens for long-term 
alignment of interests

25%

!53



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

The TOKENOMY Token Crowdsale runs between 15th January 2018 until 12th February 
2018 and the Bounty Program will run throughout the crowdsale. For completing each 
activity, users will receive a certain TEN Tokens. The number of all TEN tokens given out 
will be calculated after the token sale ends. 11 million TEN tokens will be distributed to 
the approved participants according to the stakes accumulated against the total amount 
after 1 March 2018. 


Further details about this program, can be seen here: goo.gl/hw2F73


!54



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

!55

ROADMAP



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

QUARTER 1 OF 2018 

• TOKENOMY will launch ERC20 Tokens named “TEN” on top of Ethereum Chain.


• TEN tokens will be launched and are available to purchase in three different periods: 
ITS – Tranche 1, ITS - Tranche 2, and ITS - Tranche 3 during the first quarter.


QUARTER 2 OF 2018 

• TOKENOMY will launch an exchange platform to facilitate various kinds of token 
trading where any tokens can be listed in TOKENOMY token exchange and people 
can trade them to crypto very easily.


• TOKENOMY will launch creating token services for public. People will be able to 
issue their own ERC20 tokens using the help of TOKENOMY, all the way from the 
technical aspects to marketing.


• Primary market for these ERC20 tokens will be available during this quarter.


QUARTER 3 OF 2018 

• TOKENOMY will begin to accept clients that want to do token sales using 
TOKENOMY’s platform.


!56



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

!57

AFTERMATH



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

CONCLUSION 

Blockchain technology and cryptocurrency payments are growing at an incredible 
rate, and we believe this will be the way we pay for goods and services in the future. 
There are many ways to grow your business in the cryptocurrency world, and one of 
the most popular examples is by participating in a token sale. To make it as easy as 
possible for all consumers, we at TOKENOMY, aim to offer our users a one-stop token 
sale solution that facilitates the generation of customised tokens, and to provide new 
opportunities to investors and traders to participate in the cryptocurrency market.


Blockchain and the token sale system has grown to become a new standalone 
ecosystem that is completely separated from the traditional economic system that 
depends on fiat currency. With this innovative new platform, we plan to build a new 
economic system that is more equitable.


With token sales, a wide range of individuals will have the opportunity to nurture their 
businesses, get requisite funding from trusted investors, and receive payments in 
cryptocurrency. We aim to help small entrepreneurs obtain funding through token sales 
without interference from other parties so as to promote small business growth and 
create a level playing field.


Participate in our long-term growth and success story to fundamentally change the 
world of payments, crowdfunding and banking. Get your feet wet by joining the 
Tokenomy ITS. We look forward to welcoming you on board.


!58



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

ACKNOWLEDGMENTS 

We would like to thank anyone not directly mentioned in this White Paper for supporting 
and assisting us as we make our dreams a reality. We wish to thank the entire 
blockchain community for supporting the Tokenomy team over the past 8 years. A 
special thank you also goes out to every user that has been loyal and patience in using 
our services, as we work our way towards an innovative and high-tech platform for the 
future.


!59



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

REFERENCES 

“Asia Population 2017 (Demographics, Maps, Graphs)”, data was taken from World 
Population Review, http://worldpopulationreview.com/continents/asia-population/, last 
accessed on November 4th 2017. 


“South Eastern Asia Population”, data was taken from http://www.worldometers.info/
world-population/south-eastern-asia-population/, last accessed on November 17th 
2017.


“Population by Asia Subregion”, data was derived from the following website http://
www.worldometers.info/world-population/population-by-asia-subregion/, last accessed 
on November 4th 2017.


Camilla Hodgson, “The World's 2 billion Unbanked, in 6 Charts”, taken from the website 
of Business Insider UK, accessed on November 4th 2017 from the following website: 
http://uk.businessinsider.com/the-worlds-unbanked-population-in-6-charts-2017-8/?
IR=T


Simon Kemp, “Digital in 2017: Global Overview”, taken from the website of We Are 
Social, accessed on November 5th 2017 from the following website: https://
wearesocial.com/special-reports/digital-in-2017-global-overview


World Bank Group, “The Global Findex Database 2014 Measuring Financial Inclusion 
around the World”, the information is derived from the following website: http://
d o c u m e n t s . w o r l d b a n k . o rg / c u r a t e d / e n / 1 8 7 7 6 1 4 6 8 1 7 9 3 6 7 7 0 6 / p d f /
WPS7255.pdf#page=3, accessed on October 11th 2017. 


Rohini Samtani, “Hong Kong vs. Singapore: Weighing Asia's financial hubs”, article was 
seen in the following website: https:// www.cnbc.com/2017/04/24/hong-kong-vs-
singapore-weighing-asias-financial-hubs.html (accessed on November 4th 2017) 


Dennis Brandes et al., “Deloitte Global Wealth Management Centre Ranking 
2015” (Zurich, Switzerland: Deloitte Consulting AG, 2015). 


Mark Yeandle, “Global Financial Centres Index 20” (London, U.K.: Z/Yen Group and 
China Development Institute, September 2016).


IMF, “Asia Dynamic Economies Continue to Lead Global Growth”, taken from the 
following website: https://www.imf.org/en/News/ Articles/2017/05/08/NA050917-Asia-
Dynamic-Economies-Continue-to-Lead-Global-Growth on November 4th, 2017 


The information is derived from the website of ASEANstats at http://
www.aseanstats.org/wp-content/uploads/2017/08/ ASEAN50_Master_Publication.pdf, 
accessed on October 31st 2017. 


!60

http://worldpopulationreview.com/continents/asia-population/
http://www.worldometers.info/world-population/south-eastern-asia-population/
http://www.worldometers.info/world-population/south-eastern-asia-population/
http://www.worldometers.info/world-population/population-by-asia-subregion/
http://www.worldometers.info/world-population/population-by-asia-subregion/
http://uk.businessinsider.com/the-worlds-unbanked-population-in-6-charts-2017-8/?IR=T
http://uk.businessinsider.com/the-worlds-unbanked-population-in-6-charts-2017-8/?IR=T
https://wearesocial.com/special-reports/digital-in-2017-global-overview
https://wearesocial.com/special-reports/digital-in-2017-global-overview


TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

!61
DISCLAIMER



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

IMPORTANT NOTICE


PREAMBLE 

This White Paper in current form is being circulated by the Issuer for general information 

and to invite investor feedback only on the Tokenomy platform (the “Tokenomy 

Platform”) as presently conceived, and is subject to review and revision by the directors 

of the Issuer, the advisers, and/or legal advisers of the Issuer. Please do not replicate or 

distribute any part of this White Paper without this note in accompaniment. No part of this 

White Paper is intended to create legal relations between a recipient of this White Paper, 

or to be legally binding or enforceable by such recipient, against the Issuer. An updated 

version of this White Paper may be published on a date to be determined and announced 

by the Issuer in due course. 

PLEASE READ THIS SECTION AND THE FOLLOWING SECTIONS ENTITLED 

“PREAMBLE”, “DISCLAIMER OF LIABILITY”, “NO REPRESENTATIONS AND 

WARRANTIES”, “REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES BY YOU”, 

“CAUTIONARY NOTE ON FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS”, “THIRD PARTY 

INFORMATION AND NO CONSENT OF OTHER PERSONS”, “TERMS USED”, “NO 

ADVICE”, “NO FURTHER INFORMATION OR UPDATE”, “RESTRICTIONS ON 
DISTRIBUTION AND DISSEMINATION”, “NO OFFER OF INVESTMENT OR 

REGISTRATION”, AND “RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES” CAREFULLY. 

IF YOU ARE IN ANY DOUBT AS TO THE ACTION YOU SHOULD TAKE, YOU 

SHOULD CONSULT YOUR LEGAL, FINANCIAL, TAX OR OTHER PROFESSIONAL 

ADVISOR(S). 

While we make every effort to ensure that the material in this White Paper is accurate 

and up to date, such material in no way constitutes the provision of professional advice. 

The Issuer does not guarantee, and accepts no legal liability whatsoever arising from or 

!62



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

connected to, the accuracy, reliability, currency, or completeness of any material 

contained in this White Paper. Investors and potential TEN Token holders should seek 

appropriate independent professional advice prior to relying on, or entering into any 

commitment or transaction based on, material published in this White Paper, which 

material is purely published for reference purposes alone.  

The TEN Tokens are proprietary ERC20 Token Standard cryptographic tokens developed 

and issued by the Issuer to function as the native utility token used in the Tokenomy 

Platform network as the means of value exchange, to power the Tokenomy Platform and 

incentivise the keeper nodes of the Tokenomy Platform network. “ERC20 Token 

Standard” means the set of criteria, (including criteria in relation to functions and events) 

developed by the Ethereum community, which has to be met in a smart contract on a 

blockchain in order to enable inter-operability across multiple interfaces and distributed 

applications. 

The TEN Tokens are not intended to constitute securities of any form, units in a business 

trust, units in a collective investment scheme or any other form of investment in any 

jurisdiction. This White Paper does not constitute a prospectus or offer document of any 

sort and is not intended to constitute an offer of securities of any form, units in a business 

trust, units in a collective investment scheme or any other form of investment, or a 

solicitation for any form of investment in any jurisdiction. 

This White Paper does not constitute or form part of any opinion or any advice to acquire, 

sell, or any solicitation of any offer by the Issuer to acquire any TEN Tokens nor shall it or 

any part of it nor the fact of its presentation form the basis of, or be relied upon in 

connection with, any contract or investment decision. 

The Issuer will deploy all proceeds from the sale of the TEN Tokens to support ongoing 

development and growth of the Tokenomy Platform, marketing, human resources, sales, 

and other operational activities. 

!63



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

No person is bound to enter into any contract or binding legal commitment in relation to 

the acquisition of TEN Tokens and no cryptocurrency or other form of payment is to be 

accepted on the basis of this White Paper. 

Any agreement as between the Issuer and you as a participant in the sale of the TEN 

Tokens by the Issuer (the “ITS”), and in relation to any purchase of TEN Tokens is to be 

governed by only a separate document setting out the terms and conditions (the “ITS 

Terms”) of such agreement. In the event of any inconsistencies between the ITS Terms 

and this White Paper, the former shall prevail. 

THE ITS (AS REFERRED TO IN THIS WHITE PAPER) IS INTENDED FOR, MADE TO 

OR DIRECTED AT ONLY PERSONS OUTSIDE THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA, 

THE REPUBLIC OF SINGAPORE, AND/OR THE PRC AND MAY BE ACTED UPON 

ONLY BY PERSONS OUTSIDE THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA, THE REPUBLIC 

OF SINGAPORE, AND THE PRC. ACCORDINGLY, YOU ARE NOT ELIGIBLE AND 

YOU ARE NOT TO PURCHASE ANY TEN TOKENS IN THE ITS IF YOU ARE 
LOCATED IN THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA, THE REPUBLIC OF SINGAPORE, 

OR THE PRC AT THE TIME OF YOUR INTENDED PURCHASE / PURCHASE OF TEN 

TOKENS IN THE ITS. YOU ARE ALSO NOT ELIGIBLE AND YOU ARE NOT TO 

PURCHASE ANY TEN TOKENS IN THE ITS IF YOU ARE A CITIZEN, RESIDENT, 

DOMICILED IN, OR GREEN CARD HOLDER OF THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA 

OR A CITIZEN, DOMICILED IN, OR RESIDENT OF THE REPUBLIC OF SINGAPORE 

OR THE PRC. 

No regulatory authority has examined or approved of any of the information set out in this 

White Paper. No such action has been or will be taken under the laws, regulatory 

requirements or rules of any jurisdiction. The publication, distribution or dissemination of 

this White Paper does not imply that the applicable laws, regulatory requirements or rules 

have been complied with. 

!64



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

The Issuer or this White Paper does not constitute or form part of any opinion on any 

advice to purchase, sell or otherwise transact with TEN Tokens and the fact of 

presentation of this White Paper shall not form the basis of, or be relied upon in 

connection with, any contract of investment decision. There are risks and uncertainties 

associated with the Issuer and its business and operations, the TEN Tokens, the ITS, and 

the Tokenomy Platform. Please refer to the section entitled “Risks and Disclosures” set 

out at the end of this White Paper. 

This White Paper, any part thereof and any copy thereof must not be taken or transmitted 

to any country where distribution or dissemination of this White Paper is prohibited or 

restricted. 

No part of this White Paper is to be reproduced, distributed or disseminated without 

including this section and the following sections entitled “Disclaimer of Liability”, “No 

Representations and Warranties”, “Representations and Warranties By You”, “Cautionary 

Note On Forward-Looking Statements”, “Third Party Information and No Consent of 

Other Persons”, “Terms Used”, “No Advice”, “No Further Information or Update”, 

“Restrictions On Distribution and Dissemination”, “No Offer of Investment Or Registration” 

and “Risks and Uncertainties”. 

1 

DISCLAIMER OF LIABILITY 

To the maximum extent permitted by the applicable laws, regulations and rules, the 

Issuer shall not be liable for any indirect, special, incidental, consequential or other losses 

of any kind, in tort, contract or otherwise (including but not limited to loss of revenue, 

income or profits, and loss of use or data), arising out of or in connection with any 

acceptance of or reliance on this White Paper or any part thereof by you. 

!65



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

2 

NO REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES 

The Issuer does not make or purport to make, and hereby disclaims, any representation, 

warranty or undertaking in any form whatsoever to any entity or person, including any 

representation, warranty or undertaking in relation to the truth, accuracy and 

completeness of any of the information set out in this White Paper. 

3 

REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES BY YOU 

By accessing and/or accepting possession of any information in this White Paper or such 

part thereof (as the case may be), you represent and warrant to the Issuer as follows: 

(a) you agree and acknowledge that the TEN Tokens do not constitute securities of 

any form, units in a business trust, units in a collective investment scheme or any 

other form of investment in any jurisdiction; 

(b) you are not a citizen, person domiciled in, or resident of a country the laws of 

which prohibit or conflict with the ITS or your participation in the ITS; 

(c) you agree and acknowledge that this White Paper does not constitute a 

prospectus or offer document of any sort and is not intended to constitute an offer 

of securities of any form, units in a business trust, units in a collective investment 

scheme or any other form of investment in any jurisdiction, or a solicitation for any 

form of investment, and you are not bound to enter into any contract or binding 

legal commitment and no cryptocurrency or other form of payment is to be 

accepted on the basis of this White Paper; 

(d) you acknowledge and understand that no TEN Token should be construed, 

interpreted, classified or treated as enabling, or according any opportunity to, 

!66



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

tokenholders to participate in or receive profits, income, or other payments or 

returns arising from or in connection with the TEN Tokens or the proceeds of the 

ITS, or to receive sums paid out of such profits, income, or other payments or 

returns; 

(e) you agree and acknowledge that no regulatory authority has examined or 

approved of the information set out in this White Paper, no action has been or will 

be taken under the laws, regulatory requirements or rules of any jurisdiction and 

the publication, distribution or dissemination of this White Paper to you does not 

imply that the applicable laws, regulatory requirements or rules have been 

complied with; 

(f) you agree and acknowledge that this White Paper, the undertaking and/or the 

completion of the ITS, or future trading of TEN Tokens on any cryptocurrency 

exchange, shall not be construed, interpreted or deemed by you as an indication 

of the merits of the Issuer, the TEN Tokens, the ITS, and the Tokenomy Platform; 

(g) the distribution or dissemination of this White Paper, any part thereof or any copy 

thereof, or acceptance of the same by you, is not prohibited or restricted by the 

applicable laws, regulations or rules in your jurisdiction, and where any restrictions 

in relation to possession are applicable, you have observed and complied with all 

such restrictions at your own expense and without liability to the Issuer; 

(h) you agree and acknowledge that in the case where you wish to acquire any TEN 

Tokens, TEN Tokens are not to be construed, interpreted, classified or treated as: 

(i) any kind of currency other than cryptocurrency; 

(ii) debentures, stocks or shares issued by any person or entity; 

(iii) rights, options or derivatives in respect of such debentures, stocks or 

shares; 

!67



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

(iv) rights under a contract for differences or under any other contract the 

purpose or pretended purpose of which is to secure a profit or avoid a loss; 

(v) units in a collective investment scheme; 

(vi) units in a business trust; 

(vii) derivatives of units in a business trust; or 

(viii) any form of investment;  

(i) you are fully aware of and understand that you are not eligible to acquire any TEN 

Tokens if you are a: 

(i) citizen, resident, person domiciled in, or green card holder of the United 

States of America; 

(ii) citizen, person domiciled in, or resident of the Republic of Singapore; 

(iii) citizen, person domiciled in, or resident of the PRC; or 

(iv) person who is located in the United States of America, the Republic of 

Singapore, or the PRC at the time of your intended purchase or purchase of 

TEN Tokens in the ITS; 

(j) you are legally permitted to participate in the ITS and all actions contemplated or 

associated with such participation, including the holding and use of TEN Tokens; 

(k) the amounts that you use to acquire the TEN Tokens were not and are not directly 

or indirectly derived from any activities that contravene the laws and regulations of 

any jurisdiction, including anti-money laundering laws and regulations; 

!68



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

(l) if you are a natural person, you are of sufficient age and capacity under the 

applicable laws of the jurisdiction in which you reside and the jurisdiction of which 

you are a citizen to participate in the ITS; 

(m) you are not obtaining or using TEN Tokens for any illegal purpose; 

(n) you have a basic degree of understanding of the operation, functionality, usage, 

storage, transmission mechanisms and other material characteristics of 

cryptocurrencies, blockchain-based software systems, cryptocurrency wallets or 

other related token storage mechanisms, blockchain technology, and smart 

contract technology; 

(o) you are fully aware and understand that in the case where you wish to purchase 

any TEN Tokens, there are risks associated with the Issuer and its respective 

businesses and operations, TEN Tokens, the ITS, and the Tokenomy Platform; 

(p) you bear the sole responsibility to determine what tax implications a purchase of 

TEN Tokens may have for you and agree not to hold the Issuer or any other 

person involved in the ITS liable for any tax liability associated with or arising 

therefrom; 

(q) you agree and acknowledge that the Issuer is not liable for any direct, indirect, 

special, incidental, consequential or other losses of any kind, in tort, contract or 

otherwise (including but not limited to loss of revenue, income or profits, and loss 

of use or data), arising out of or in connection with any acceptance of or reliance 

on this White Paper or any part thereof by you;  

(r) you waive the right to participate in a class action lawsuit or a class wide 

arbitration against the Issuer and/or any person involved in the ITS and/or with the 

creation and distribution of TEN Tokens; and 

!69



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

(s) all of the above representations and warranties are true, complete, accurate and 

non-misleading from the time of your access to and/or acceptance of possession 

this White Paper or such part thereof (as the case may be). 

4 

CAUTIONARY NOTE ON FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS 

All statements contained in this White Paper, statements made in press releases or in 

any place accessible by the public and oral statements that may be made by the Issuer 

or its directors, executive officers or employees acting on behalf of the Issuer (as the 

case may be), that are not statements of historical fact, constitute “forward-looking 

statements”. Some of these statements can be identified by forward-looking terms such 

as “aim”, “target”, “anticipate”, “believe”, “could”, “estimate”, “expect”, “if”, “intend”, “may”, 

“plan”, “possible”, “probable”, “project”, “should”, “would”, “will” or other similar terms. 

However, these terms are not the exclusive means of identifying forward-looking 

statements. All statements regarding the Issuer’s business strategies, plans and 

prospects and the future prospects of the industry which the Issuer is in are forward-

looking statements. These forward-looking statements, including but not limited to 

statements as to the Issuer’s prospects, future plans, other expected industry trends and 

other matters discussed in this White Paper regarding the Issuer are matters that are not 

historic facts, but only predictions. 

These forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and 

other factors that may cause the actual future results, performance or achievements of 

the Issuer to be materially different from any future results, performance or achievements 

expected, expressed or implied by such forward-looking statements. These factors 

include, amongst others: 

!7012



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

(a) changes in political, social, economic and stock or cryptocurrency market 

conditions, and the regulatory environment in the countries in which the Issuer 

conducts its business and operations, including Singapore; 

(b) the risk that the Issuer may be unable to execute or implement its business 

strategies and future plans; 

(c) changes in interest rates and exchange rates of fiat currencies and 

cryptocurrencies; 

(d) changes in the anticipated growth strategies and expected internal growth of the 

Issuer and the Tokenomy Platform; 

(e) changes in the availability and fees payable to the Issuer in connection with its 

businesses and operations or in the Tokenomy Platform; 

(f) changes in the availability and salaries of employees who are required by the 

Issuer to operate their respective businesses and operations; 

(g) changes in preferences of users of the Tokenomy Platform; 

(h) changes in competitive conditions under which the Issuer operates, and the ability 

of the Issuer to compete under such conditions; 

(i) changes in the future capital needs of the Issuer and the availability of financing 

and capital to fund such needs; 

(j) war or acts of international or domestic terrorism; 

(k) occurrences of catastrophic events, natural disasters and acts of God that affect 

the businesses and/or operations of the Issuer; 

(l) other factors beyond the control of the Issuer; and 

!71



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

(m) any risk and uncertainties associated with the Issuer and its business and 

operations, the TEN Tokens, the ITS, and the Tokenomy Platform. 

All forward-looking statements made by or attributable to the Issuer or persons acting on 

behalf of the Issuer are expressly qualified in their entirety by such factors. Given that 

risks and uncertainties that may cause the actual future results, performance or 

achievements of the Issuer to be materially different from that expected, expressed or 

implied by the forward-looking statements in this White Paper, undue reliance must not 

be placed on these statements. These forward-looking statements are applicable only as 

of the date of this White Paper. 

Neither the Issuer nor any other person represents, warrants, and/or undertakes that the 

actual future results, performance or achievements of the Issuer will be as discussed in 

those forward-looking statements. The actual results, performance or achievements of 

the Issuer may differ materially from those anticipated in these forward-looking 

statements. 

Nothing contained in this White Paper is or may be relied upon as a promise, 

representation or undertaking as to the future performance or policies of the Issuer. 

Further, the Issuer disclaims any responsibility to update any of those forward-looking 

statements or publicly announce any revisions to those forward-looking statements to 

reflect future developments, events or circumstances, even if new information becomes 

available or other events occur in the future. 

!72



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

5 

THIRD PARTY INFORMATION AND NO CONSENT OF OTHER PERSONS 

This White Paper includes information obtained from various third party sources (“Third 

Party Information”). None of the publishers of Third Party Information has consented to 

the inclusion of Third Party Information in this White Paper and is therefore not liable for 

Third Party Information. While the Issuer has taken reasonable action to ensure that 

Third Party Information have been included in their proper form and context, neither the 

Issuer, nor its directors, executive officers, and employees acting on its behalf, has 

independently verified the accuracy, reliability, completeness of the contents, or 

ascertained any applicable underlying assumption, of the relevant Third Party 

Information. Consequently, neither the Issuer nor its directors, executive officers and 

employees acting on their behalf makes any representation or warranty as to the 

accuracy, reliability or completeness of such information and shall not be obliged to 

provide any updates on the same. 

6 

TERMS USED 

To facilitate a better understanding of the TEN Tokens being the subject of the sale 

conducted by the Issuer, and the businesses and operations of the Issuer, certain 

technical terms and abbreviations, as well as, in certain instances, their descriptions, 

have been used in this White Paper. These descriptions and assigned meanings should 

not be treated as being definitive of their meanings and may not correspond to standard 

industry meanings or usage. 

Words importing the singular shall, where applicable, include the plural and vice versa 

and words importing the masculine gender shall, where applicable, include the feminine 

and neuter genders and vice versa. References to persons shall include corporations. 

!73



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

7 

NO ADVICE / RECOMMENDATION / GUIDANCE 

No information in this White Paper should be considered to be business, legal, financial 

or tax advice regarding the Issuer, the TEN Tokens, the ITS, or the Tokenomy Platform. 

You should consult your own legal, financial, tax or other professional adviser regarding 

the Issuer and its business and operations, the TEN Tokens, the ITS, and the Tokenomy 

Platform. You should be aware that you may be required to bear the financial risk of any 

purchase of TEN Tokens for an indefinite period of time. 

8 

NO FURTHER INFORMATION OR UPDATE 

No person has been or is authorised to give any information or representation not 

contained in this White Paper in connection with the Issuer and its business and 

operations, the TEN Tokens, the ITS, or the Tokenomy Platform, if given, such 

information or representation must not be relied upon as having been authorised by or on 

behalf of the Issuer. The ITS shall not, under any circumstances, constitute a continuing 

representation or create any suggestion or implication that there has been no change, or 

development reasonably likely to involve a material change in the affairs, conditions and 

prospects of the Issuer or in any statement of fact or information contained in this White 

Paper since the date hereof. 

9 

RESTRICTIONS ON DISTRIBUTION AND DISSEMINATION 

The distribution or dissemination of this White Paper or any part thereof may be 

prohibited or restricted by the laws, regulatory requirements, and rules of any 

jurisdiction. In the case where any restriction applies, you are to inform yourself about, 

and to observe, any restrictions which are applicable to your possession of this White 

!74



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

Paper or such part thereof (as the case may be) at your own expense and without 

liability to the Issuer. 

Persons to whom a copy of this White Paper has been distributed or disseminated, 

provided access to or who otherwise have the White Paper in their possession shall not 

circulate it to any other persons, reproduce or otherwise distribute this White Paper or 

any information contained herein for any purpose whatsoever nor permit or cause the 

same to occur. 

10 

NO OFFER OF INVESTMENT OR REGISTRATION 

This White Paper does not constitute a prospectus or offer document of any sort and is 

not intended to constitute an offer of securities of any form, units in a business trust, 

units in a collective investment scheme or any other form of investment, or a solicitation 

for any form of investment in any jurisdiction. No person is bound to enter into any 

contract or binding legal commitment and no cryptocurrency or other form of payment is 

to be accepted on the basis of this White Paper. 

THE ITS (AS REFERRED TO IN THIS WHITE PAPER) IS INTENDED FOR, MADE TO 

OR DIRECTED AT ONLY PERSONS OUTSIDE THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA, 
THE REPUBLIC OF SINGAPORE, AND THE PRC AND MAY BE ACTED UPON ONLY 

BY PERSONS OUTSIDE THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA, THE REPUBLIC OF 

SINGAPORE, AND/OR THE PRC. ACCORDINGLY, YOU ARE NOT ELIGIBLE AND 

YOU ARE NOT TO PURCHASE ANY TEN TOKENS IN THE ITS IF YOU ARE 

LOCATED IN THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA, THE REPUBLIC OF SINGAPORE, 

OR THE PRC AT THE TIME OF YOUR INTENDED PURCHASE / PURCHASE OF TEN 
TOKENS IN THE ITS. YOU ARE ALSO NOT ELIGIBLE AND YOU ARE NOT TO 

PURCHASE ANY TEN TOKENS IN THE ITS IF YOU ARE A CITIZEN, RESIDENT, 

DOMICILED IN, OR GREEN CARD HOLDER OF THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA 

!75



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

OR A CITIZEN, DOMICILED IN, OR RESIDENT OF THE REPUBLIC OF SINGAPORE 

OR THE PRC. 

No regulatory authority has examined or approved of any of the information set out in 

this White Paper. No such action has been or will be taken under the laws, regulatory 

requirements or rules of any jurisdiction. The publication, distribution or dissemination of 

this White Paper does not imply that the applicable laws, regulatory requirements or 

rules have been complied with. 

11 

RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES 

Prospective purchasers of TEN Tokens should carefully consider and evaluate all risks 

and uncertainties associated with the Issuer and its business and operations, the TEN 

Tokens, the ITS, and the Tokenomy Platform, all information set out in this White Paper 

and the ITS Terms prior to any purchase of the TEN Tokens. If any of such risks and 

uncertainties develops into actual events, the business, financial condition, results of 

operations and prospects of the Issuer could be materially and adversely affected. In 

such cases, you may lose all or part of the value of the TEN Tokens. 

Please read the following risks and warnings before deciding to purchase TEN Tokens. It 

should be noted the following list of risks and warnings is not exhaustive. Accordingly, 

prospective purchasers should not place undue reliance on these statements. 

1. RISKS RELATING TO PARTICIPATION IN THE ITS 

There is no prior market for TEN Tokens and the ITS may not result in an 

active or liquid market for the TEN Tokens  

Prior to the ITS, there has been no public market for the TEN Tokens. In the event 

that the TEN Tokens are traded on a cryptocurrency exchange, there is no 

assurance that an active or liquid trading market for the TEN Tokens will develop 

!76



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

or if developed, be sustained after the TEN Tokens have been made available for 

trading on such cryptocurrency exchange. There is also no assurance that the 

market price of the TEN Tokens will not decline below the purchase price of the 

TEN Tokens (the “Purchase Price”). The Purchase Price may not be indicative of 

the market price of the TEN Tokens after they have been made available for 

trading on a cryptocurrency exchange. 

A TEN Token is not a currency issued by any central bank or national, supra-

national or quasi-national organisation, nor is it backed by any hard assets or other 

credit. The Issuer is not responsible for nor does it pursue the circulation and 

trading of TEN Tokens on the market. Trading of TEN Tokens merely depends on 

the consensus on its value between the relevant market participants, and no one 

is obliged to purchase any TEN Token from any holder of the TEN Token, 

including the purchasers, nor does anyone guarantee the liquidity or market price 

of TEN Tokens to any extent at any time. Accordingly, the Issuer cannot ensure 

that there will be any demand or market for TEN Tokens, or that the Purchase 

Price is indicative of the market price of TEN Tokens after they have been made 

available for trading on a cryptocurrency exchange. 

Future sales of the TEN Tokens could materially and adversely affect the 

market price of TEN Tokens 

Any future sale of the TEN Tokens (which were not available for sale in the ITS) 

would increase the supply of TEN Tokens in the market and this may result in a 

downward price pressure on the Token. The sale or distribution of a significant 

number of TEN Tokens outside of the ITS, or the perception that such further sales 

or issuance may occur, could adversely affect the trading price of the TEN Tokens. 

Negative publicity may materially and adversely affect the price of the TEN 

Tokens 

!77



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

Negative publicity involving the Issuer, the Tokenomy Platform, the TEN Tokens or 

any of the key personnel of the Issuer may materially and adversely affect the 

market perception or market price of the TEN Tokens, whether or not such 

negative publicity is justified.  

There is no assurance of any success of the Tokenomy Platform 

The value of, and demand for, the TEN Tokens hinges heavily on the performance 

of the Tokenomy Platform. There is no assurance that the Tokenomy Platform will 

gain traction after its launch and achieve any commercial success.  

The Tokenomy Platform has not been fully developed, finalised and integrated and 

is subject to further changes, updates and adjustments prior to its launch. Such 

changes may result in unexpected and unforeseen effects on its projected appeal 

to users, and hence impact its success.  

While the Issuer has made every effort to provide a realistic estimate, there is also 

no assurance that the cryptocurrencies raised in the ITS will be sufficient for the 

development and integration of the Tokenomy Platform. For the foregoing or any 

other reason, the development and integration of the Tokenomy Platform may not 

be completed and there is no assurance that it will be launched at all. As such, 

distributed TEN Tokens may hold little worth or value, and this would impact its 

trading price. 

If and when the Tokenomy Platform is fully developed, there is no assurance it will 

be widely adopted or utilised by its target users.  

The trading price of the TEN Tokens may fluctuate following the ITS 

The prices of cryptographic tokens in general tend to be relatively volatile, and can 

fluctuate significantly over short periods of time. The demand for, and 

correspondingly the market price of, the TEN Tokens may fluctuate significantly 

!78



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

and rapidly in response to, among others, the following factors, some of which are 

beyond the control of the Issuer: 

(a) new technical innovations; 

(b) analysts’ speculations, recommendations, perceptions or estimates of the 

TEN Token’s market price or the Issuer’s financial and business 

performance; 

(c) changes in market valuations and token prices of entities with operations 

similar to that of the Issuer that may be made available for sale and 

purchase on the same cryptocurrency exchanges as the TEN Tokens; 

(d) announcements by the Issuer of significant events, for example 

partnerships, sponsorships, new product developments; 

(e) fluctuations in market prices and trading volume of cryptocurrencies on 

cryptocurrency exchanges; 

(f) additions or departures of key personnel of the Issuer; 

(g) success or failure of the Issuer’s management in implementing business 

and growth strategies; and 

(h) changes in conditions affecting the blockchain or financial technology 

industry, the general economic conditions or market sentiments, or other 

events or factors. 

The funds raised in the ITS are exposed to risks of theft 

The Issuer will make every effort to ensure that the funds received from the ITS 

will be securely held at such address as directed by the Issuer (“Receiving 
Address”). Further, upon receipt of the funds, the Issuer will make every effort to 

ensure that the funds received will be securely held through the implementation of 

!79



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

security measures. Notwithstanding such security measures, there is no 

assurance that there will be no theft of the cryptocurrencies as a result of hacks, 

mining attacks (including but not limited to double-spend attacks, majority mining 

power attacks and “selfish-mining” attacks), sophisticated cyber-attacks, 

distributed denials of service or errors, vulnerabilities or defects on the Receiving 

Address, the Bitcoin Blockchain, the Ethereum Blockchain, or any other 

blockchain, or otherwise. Such events may include, for example, flaws in 

programming or source code leading to exploitation or abuse thereof. In such 

event, even if the ITS is completed, the Issuer may not be able to receive the 

cryptocurrencies raised and the Issuer may not be able to utilise such funds for the 

development of the Tokenomy Platform, and the launch of the Tokenomy Platform 

might be temporarily or permanently curtailed. As such, the issued TEN Tokens 

may hold little worth or value, and this would impact its trading price. The TEN 

Tokens are uninsured, unless you specifically obtain private insurance to insure 

them. In the event of any loss or loss of value, you may have no recourse. 

2. RISKS RELATING TO THE RECEIVING ADDRESS AND WALLETS 

The Receiving Address may be compromised and the cryptocurrencies may 

not be able to be disbursed 

The Receiving Address is designed to be secure. However, in the event that the 

Receiving Address is, for any reason compromised (including but not limited to 

scenarios of the loss of keys to such Receiving Address), the funds held by the 

Receiving Address may not be able to be retrieved and disbursed, and may be 

permanently unrecoverable. In such event, even if the ITS is successful, the Issuer 

will not be able to receive the funds raised and the Issuer will not be able to utilise 

!80
AFTERMATH



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

such funds for the development of the Tokenomy Platform, and the implementation 

of the Tokenomy Platform might be temporarily or permanently curtailed. As such, 

distributed TEN Tokens may hold little worth or value, and this would impact its 

trading price. 

The loss or compromise of information relating to your wallet may affect 

your access and possession of the TEN Tokens 

Your access to the TEN Tokens in a cryptocurrency wallet (“Wallet”) depends on, 
among other things, the safeguards to the information to such Wallet, including but 

not limited to the user account information, address, private key, and password. In 

the event that any of the foregoing is lost or compromised, your access to the 

Wallet may be curtailed and thereby adversely affecting your access and 

possession to the TEN Tokens, including such TEN Tokens being unrecoverable 

and permanently lost. 

The Wallet or Wallet service provider may not be technically compatible with 

the TEN Tokens 

The Wallet or Wallet service provider may not be technically compatible with the 

TEN Tokens which may result in the delivery of TEN Tokens being unsuccessful or 

affect your access to such TEN Tokens. 

3. RISKS RELATING TO THE ISSUER  

The Tokenomy Platform is operated and maintained by the Issuer. Any events or 

circumstances which adversely affect the Issuer may have a corresponding 

adverse effect on the Tokenomy Platform if such events or circumstances affect 

the Issuer’s ability to maintain the Tokenomy Platform. This would correspondingly 

have an impact on the trading price of the TEN Tokens. 

!81



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

The Issuer may be materially and adversely affected if it fails to effectively 

manage its operations as its business develops and evolves, which would 
have a direct impact on its ability to maintain the Tokenomy Platform and 

consequently the trading price of the TEN Tokens. 

The financial technology and cryptocurrency industries and the markets in which 

the Issuer competes have grown rapidly and continue to grow rapidly and evolve 

in response to new technological advances, changing business models and other 

factors. As a result of this constantly changing environment, the Issuer may face 

operational difficulties in adjusting to the changes, and the sustainability of the 

Issuer will depend on its ability to manage its operations, adapt to technological 

advances and market trends and ensure that it hires qualified and competent 

employees, and provide proper training for its personnel.  

As its business evolves, the Issuer must also expand and adapt its operational 

infrastructure. The Issuer’s business relies on its blockchain-based software 

systems, cryptocurrency wallets or other related token storage mechanisms, 

blockchain technology and smart contract technology, and to manage technical 

support infrastructure for the Tokenomy Platform effectively, the Issuer will need to 

continue to upgrade and improve its data systems and other operational systems, 

procedures and controls. These upgrades and improvements will require a 

dedication of resources, are likely to be complex and increasingly rely on hosted 

computer services from third parties that the Issuer does not control. If the Issuer 

is unable to adapt its systems and organisation in a timely, efficient and cost-

effective manner to accommodate changing circumstances, its business, financial 

condition and results of operations may be adversely affected. If the third parties 

whom the Issuer relies on are subject to a security breach or otherwise suffer 

disruptions that impact the services the Issuer utilises, the integrity and availability 

of its internal information could be compromised, which may consequently cause 

the loss of confidential or proprietary information, and economic loss.  

!82



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

The loss of financial, labour or other resources, and any other adverse effect on 

the Issuer’s business, financial condition and operations, would have a direct 

adverse effect on the Issuer’s ability to maintain the Tokenomy Platform. As the 

Tokenomy Platform is the main product to which the TEN Tokens relate, this may 

adversely impact the trading price of the TEN Tokens. 

There may be weaknesses, vulnerabilities or bugs in the Tokenomy smart 

contract  

The Issuer will make reasonable efforts to ensure that the smart contracts 

underlying the TEN Tokens are audited, tested and approved by technical experts. 

However, as smart contract technology is still in its early stage of development and 

its application of experimental nature carries significant operation, technological, 

financial, regulatory and reputational risks, there are inherent risks that such smart 

contracts could contain weaknesses, vulnerabilities or bugs.  

Purchasers of TEN Tokens should understand and accept that there are no 

warranties that TEN Tokens are fit for a particular purpose or do not contain any 

weaknesses, vulnerabilities or bugs which would cause loss in their worth or value. 

In the event that any of the aforementioned risks materialises, the Issuer’s 

business strategies, results of operations and prospects may also be adversely 

affected. 

The Issuer may experience system failures, unplanned interruptions in its 

network or services, hardware or software defects, security breaches or 

other causes that could adversely affect the Issuer’s infrastructure network, 

and/or the Tokenomy Platform 

The Issuer is unable to anticipate when there would be occurrences of hacks, 

cyber-attacks, mining attacks (including but not limited to double-spend attacks, 

majority mining power attacks and “selfish-mining” attacks), distributed denials of 

service or errors, vulnerabilities or defects in the Tokenomy Platform, the TEN 

!83



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

Tokens, the Receiving Address, the Wallet or any technology (including but not 

limited to smart contract technology) on which the Issuer, the Tokenomy Platform, 

the TEN Tokens, the Receiving Address, and the Wallet relies or on the Bitcoin 

Blockchain, the Ethereum Blockchain or any other blockchain. Such events may 

include, for example, flaws in programming or source code leading to exploitation 

or abuse thereof. The Issuer may not be able to detect such hacks, mining attacks 

(including but not limited to double-spend attacks, majority mining power attacks 

and “selfish-mining” attacks), cyber-attacks, distributed denials of service errors 

vulnerabilities or defects in a timely manner, and may not have sufficient resources 

to efficiently cope with multiple service incidents happening simultaneously or in 

rapid succession.  

The Issuer’s network or services, which would include the Tokenomy Platform, 

could be disrupted by numerous events, including natural disasters, equipment 

breakdown, network connectivity downtime, power losses, or even intentional 

disruptions of its services, such as disruptions caused by software viruses or 

attacks by unauthorised users, some of which are beyond the Issuer’s control. 

Although the Issuer has taken steps against malicious attacks on its appliances or 

its infrastructure, which are critical for the maintenance of the Tokenomy Platform 

and its other services, there can be no assurance that cyber-attacks, such as 

distributed denials of service, will not be attempted in the future, and that any of 

the Issuer’s enhanced security measures will be effective. The Issuer may be 

prone to attacks on its infrastructure intended to steal information about its 

technology, financial data or user information or take other actions that would be 

damaging to the Issuer and users of the Tokenomy Platform. Any significant 

breach of the Issuer’s security measures or other disruptions resulting in a 

compromise of the usability, stability and security of the Issuer’s network or 

services (including the Tokenomy Platform) may adversely affect the trading price 

of the TEN Tokens. 

!84



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

We are dependent in part on the location and data centre facilities of third 

parties 

The Issuer’s infrastructure network is in part established through servers that 

which it owns and houses at the location facilities of third parties, and servers that 

it rents at data centre facilities of third parties. If the Issuer is unable to renew its 

data facility lease on commercially reasonable terms or at all, the Issuer may be 

required to transfer its servers to a new data centre facility, and may incur 

significant costs and possible service interruption in connection with the relocation. 

These facilities are also vulnerable to damage or interruption from, among others, 

natural disasters, arson, terrorist attacks, power losses, and telecommunication 

failures. Additionally, the third party providers of such facilities may suffer a breach 

of security as a result of third party action, employee error, malfeasance or 

otherwise, and a third party may obtain unauthorised access to the data in such 

servers. As techniques used to obtain unauthorised access to, or to sabotage 

systems change frequently and generally are not recognised until launched 

against a target, the Issuer and the providers of such facilities may be unable to 

anticipate these techniques or to implement adequate preventive measures. Any 

such security breaches or damages which occur which impact upon the Issuer’s 

infrastructure network and/or the Tokenomy Platform may adversely impact the 

price of the TEN Tokens. 

General global market and economic conditions may have an adverse 

impact on the Issuer’s operating performance, results of operations and 

cash flows 

The Issuer has been and could continue to be affected by general global economic 

and market conditions. Challenging economic conditions worldwide have from time 

to time, contributed, and may continue to contribute, to slowdowns in the 

information technology industry at large. Weakness in the economy could have a 

negative effect on the Issuer’s business, operations and financial condition, 

!85



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

including decreases in revenue and operating cash flows. Additionally, in a down-

cycle economic environment, the Issuer may experience the negative effects of 

increased competitive pricing pressure and a slowdown in commerce and usage of 

the Tokenomy Platform. Suppliers on which the Issuer relies for servers, 

bandwidth, location and other services could also be negatively impacted by 

economic conditions that, in turn, could have a negative impact on the Issuer’s 

operations or expenses. There can be no assurance, therefore, that current 

economic conditions or worsening economic conditions or a prolonged or recurring 

recession will not have a significant adverse impact on the Issuer’s business, 

financial condition and results of operations and hence the Tokenomy Platform, 

which would correspondingly impact the trading price of the TEN Tokens. 

The Issuer or the TEN Tokens may be affected by newly implemented 

regulations 

Cryptocurrency trading is generally unregulated worldwide, but numerous 

regulatory authorities across jurisdictions have been outspoken about considering 

the implementation of regulatory regimes which govern cryptocurrency or 

cryptocurrency markets. The Issuer or the TEN Tokens may be affected by newly 

implemented regulations relating to cryptocurrencies or cryptocurrency markets, 

including having to take measures to comply with such regulations, or having to 

deal with queries, notices, requests or enforcement actions by regulatory 

authorities, which may come at a substantial cost and may also require substantial 

modifications to the Tokenomy Platform. This may impact the appeal of the 

Tokenomy Platform for users and result in decreased usage of the Tokenomy 

Platform. Further, should the costs (financial or otherwise) of complying with such 

newly implemented regulations exceed a certain threshold, maintaining the 

Tokenomy Platform may no longer be commercially viable and the Issuer may opt 

to discontinue the Tokenomy Platform and/or the TEN Tokens. Further, it is difficult 

to predict how or whether governments or regulatory authorities may implement 

!86



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

any changes to laws and regulations affecting distributed ledger technology and its 

applications, including the Tokenomy Platform and the TEN Tokens. The Issuer 

may also have to cease operations in a jurisdiction that makes it illegal to operate 

in such jurisdiction, or make it commercially unviable or undesirable to obtain the 

necessary regulatory approval(s) to operate in such jurisdiction. In scenarios such 

as the foregoing, the trading price of TEN Tokens will be adversely affected or TEN 

Tokens may cease to be traded. 

There may be risks relating to acts of God, natural disasters, wars, terrorist 

attacks, riots, civil commotions widespread communicable diseases and 

other force majeure events beyond the control of the Issuer 

The ITS and the performance of the Issuer’s activities may be interrupted, 

suspended or delayed due to acts of God, natural disasters, wars, terrorist attacks, 

riots, civil commotions, widespread communicable diseases and other force 

majeure events beyond the control of the Issuer. Such events could also lead to 

uncertainty in the economic outlook of global markets and there is no assurance 

that such markets will not be affected, or that recovery from the global financial 

crisis would continue. In such events, the Issuer’s business strategies, results of 

operations and prospects may be materially and adversely affected. Further, if an 

outbreak of such infectious or communicable diseases occurs in any of the 

countries in which the Issuer, the developers, data providers or data consumers 

have operations in the future, market sentiment could be adversely affected and 

this may have a negative impact on the Tokenomy Platform and community.  

There may be unanticipated risks arising from the TEN Tokens 

Cryptographic tokens such as the TEN Tokens are a relatively new and dynamic 

technology. In addition to the risks included hereto, there are other risks 

associated with your purchase, holding and use of the TEN Tokens, including 

!87



TOKENOMY - GLOBAL TOKEN PLATFORM

those that the Issuer cannot anticipate. Such risks may further materialise as 

unanticipated variations or combinations of the risks discussed hereto.  

!88


